test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-Clex_tuhhid_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Pl1: rievˊviiččijm
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Pl2: rievˊviiččijd
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Pl3: rievˊviiččii
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Sg1: rievˊviižeem
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Sg2: rievˊviižeeh
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Sg3: rievˊviš     
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Du1: rievˊviižeen
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Du2: rievˊvišvettee     
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Du3: rievˊviižává
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Pl1: rievˊviižep
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Pl2: rievˊvišvetteđ    
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Pl3: rievˊviižeh
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: rievˊvejum
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: rievˊvii
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: rievˊvejus
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Du1: rievˊvejoon
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Du2: rievˊvejee
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Du3: rievˊvejus
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: rievˊvejop
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: rievˊviđ
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: rievˊvejus
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: rievˊvii
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: rievˊvim
    rievviđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: rievˊviiččii
    rievviđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: rievˊviižii
    rievviđ+V+PrsPrc: [rievˊvejeijee, rievˊvejijjee]
    rievviđ+V+PrfPrc: rievˊvim
    rievviđ+V+Actio: rievˊvim
    rievviđ+V+Actio+Ess: rievˊviimin
    rievviđ+V+Actio+Loc: rievˊviimist
    rievviđ+V+Actio+Ill: rievˊviimân
    rievviđ+V+Ger: rievˊviidijn
    rievviđ+V+VAbess: rievˊviihánnáá
    
    
         Verb - keksiđ: # 
    keksiđ+V+Inf: keksiđ
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: keksiim
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: keksiih
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keksee
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: keksejeen
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: keksiivettee
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: keksiv
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: keksip
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: keksiiivetteđ
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: keksejeh
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: keksejim
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: keksejih
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: keksij
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: keksijm
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: keksijd
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: keksijn
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: keksijm
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: keksijd
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: keksejii
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: keksiiččim
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: keksiiččih
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: keksiiččij
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Du1: keksiiččáim
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Du2: keksiiččáid
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Du3: keksiiččáin
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: keksiiččijm
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: keksiiččijd
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: keksiiččii
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: keksiižeem
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: keksiižeeh
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: keksiš      
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Du1: keksiižeen
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Du2: keksišvettee      
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Du3: keksiižává
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: keksiižep
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: keksišvetteđ     
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: keksiižeh
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: keksejum
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: keksii
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: keksejus
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: keksejoon
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: keksejee
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: keksejus
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: keksejop
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: keksiđ
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: keksejus
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: keksii
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: keksim
    keksiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: keksiiččii
    keksiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: keksiižii
    keksiđ+V+PrsPrc: [keksejeijee, keksejijjee]
    keksiđ+V+PrfPrc: keksim
    keksiđ+V+Actio: keksim
    keksiđ+V+Actio+Ess: keksiimin
    keksiđ+V+Actio+Loc: keksiimist
    keksiđ+V+Actio+Ill: keksiimân
    keksiđ+V+Ger: keksiidijn
    keksiđ+V+VAbess: keksiihánnáá
    
    
         Verb - snuittiđ: # 
    snuittiđ+V+Inf: snuittiđ
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snuittiim
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: snuittiih
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snuittee
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: snuittejeen
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: snuittiivettee
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: snuittiv
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: snuittip
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: snuittiivetteđ
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: snuittejeh
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: snuittejim
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: snuittejih
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: snuittij
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: snuittijm
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: snuittijd
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: snuittijn
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: snuittijm
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: snuittijd
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: snuittejii
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: snuittiiččim
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: snuittiiččih
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: snuittiiččij
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Du1: snuittiiččáim
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Du2: snuittiiččáid
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Du3: snuittiiččáin
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: snuittiiččijm
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: snuittiiččijd
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: snuittiiččii
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: snuittiižeem
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: snuittiižeeh
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: snuittiš      
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Du1: snuittiižeen
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Du2: snuittišvettee      
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Du3: snuittiižává
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: snuittiižep
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: snuittišvetteđ      
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: snuittiižeh
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: snuittejum
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: snuittii
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: snuittejus
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: snuittejoon
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: snuittejee
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: snuittejus
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: snuittejop
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: snuittiđ
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: snuittejus
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: snuittii
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: snuittim
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: snuittiiččii
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: snuittiižii
    snuittiđ+V+PrsPrc: [snuittejeijee, snuittejijjee]
    snuittiđ+V+PrfPrc: snuittim
    snuittiđ+V+Actio: snuittim
    snuittiđ+V+Actio+Ess: snuittiimin
    snuittiđ+V+Actio+Loc: snuittiimist
    snuittiđ+V+Actio+Ill: snuittiimân
    snuittiđ+V+Ger: snuittiidijn
    snuittiđ+V+VAbess: snuittiihánnáá
